Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Safety Glazing in Hazardous Locations

198B.300.
Definitions for KRS 198B.310 to 198B.330.

As used in KRS 198B.310 to 198B.330:

“Safety glazing material” means any glazing material, such as tempered glass, laminated glass, wire glass, or rigid plastic that:

Meets the test requirements of the current ANSI standard or other generally accepted industry standard as adopted by the department through the promulgation of an administrative regulation;

Is so constructed, treated, or combined with other materials to minimize the likelihood of cutting or piercing injuries resulting from human contact with the glazing material; and

Complies with any further requirements that may be adopted by the department; and

“Hazardous locations” means those installations, glazed or to be glazed, in residential, commercial and public buildings known as sliding glass doors, framed or unframed glass doors and adjacent fixed glazed panels which may be mistaken for means of ingress or egress, storm doors, shower doors, and tub inclosures, whether or not the glazing in such doors, panels or inclosures is transparent, and in any other area wherein the use of other than safety glazing materials would constitute a hazard.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 227, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(12); amended and reenacted 1980, ch. 188, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 259, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 15, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.310.
Labeling requirements.

Each light of safety glazing material manufactured, distributed, imported, or sold for use in hazardous locations or installed in a similar location within the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be permanently labeled by such means as etching, sandblasting or firing ceramic material on the safety glazing material. The label shall identify the labeler, whether manufacturer, fabricator, or installer, and the nominal thickness and the type of safety glazing material and the fact that the material meets the test requirements of the current ANSI standard or other generally accepted industry standard as adopted by the department through the promulgation of an administrative regulation; and any further requirements that may be adopted by the department. The label shall be legible and visible after installation.

Safety glazing labeling shall not be used on other than safety glazing materials.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 227, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(12); repealed and reenacted 1980, ch. 188, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 260, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

198B.320.
Prohibitions.

It shall be unlawful within the Commonwealth of Kentucky to knowingly sell, fabricate, assemble, glaze, install, consent or cause to be installed glazing materials other than safety glazing materials in, or for use in, any hazardous location.

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 227, § 3; repealed and reenacted 1980, ch. 188, § 6, effective July 15, 1980.

198B.330.
Workers exempt from liability.

No liability under KRS 198B.310 to this section shall be created as to workers who are employees of a contractor, subcontractor, or other employer responsible for compliance with KRS 198B.310 to this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 227, § 4; amended and reenacted 1980, ch. 188, § 7, effective July 15, 1980.